California, session 20252026, AB2572.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66010.4 of the Education Code is amended to read:66010.4. The missions and functions of California’s public and independent segments, and their respective institutions of higher education, shall be differentiated as follows:(a) (1) The California Community Colleges shall, as a primary mission, offer academic and vocational instruction at the lower division level for both younger and older students, including those persons returning to school. Public community colleges shall offer instruction through but not beyond the second year of college. These institutions may grant the associate in arts and the associate in science degree.(2) The community colleges’ mission shall include all of the following:(A) The provision of instruction and additional learning supports to close learning gaps for those who need it, instruction in English as a second language, adult noncredit instruction, and support services that help students succeed at the postsecondary level.(B) The provision of adult noncredit education curricula in areas defined as being in the state’s interest is an essential and important function of the community colleges.(C) The provision of community services courses and programs is an authorized function of the community colleges if their provision is compatible with an institution’s ability to meet its obligations in its primary missions.(D) The provision of student support services to facilitate academic success and achievement.(3) A primary mission of the California Community Colleges is to advance California’s economic growth and global competitiveness through education, training, and services that contribute to continuous workforce improvement.(4) The California Community Colleges may conduct institutional research concerning student learning and retention, and community college programming to facilitate its educational mission.(5) The provision of instruction and support to close learning gaps authorized by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be provided in the form of concurrent support, unless college data and research demonstrates that even with concurrent support a student is highly unlikely to succeed in the course.(b) (1) The California State University shall offer undergraduate and graduate instruction through the master’s degree in the liberal arts and sciences and professional education, including teacher education. Notwithstanding any other law, undergraduate undergraduate, graduate, and graduate doctoral degrees may be awarded jointly with one or more independent institutions of higher education and accredited international institutions of higher education. Presently established two-year programs in agriculture are authorized, but other two-year programs shall be permitted only when mutually agreed upon by the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. (2)The doctoral degree may be awarded jointly, as follows: (A)With (2) A doctoral degree may be awarded jointly with the University of California, as provided in subdivision (c) and pursuant to Section 66904. (B)With one or more independent institutions of higher education, provided that the proposed doctoral program is approved by the California Postsecondary Education Commission. (C)With international institutions of higher education if the doctoral degree program has been authorized pursuant to Article 4.92 (commencing with Section 66046). (3) Research, scholarship, and creative activity in support of its undergraduate and graduate instructional mission is authorized in the California State University and shall be supported by the state.(4) The primary mission of the California State University is undergraduate and graduate instruction through the master’s degree.(c) The University of California may provide undergraduate and graduate instruction in the liberal arts and sciences and in the professions, including the teaching professions. It shall have exclusive jurisdiction in public higher education over instruction in the profession of law and over graduate instruction in the professions of medicine, dentistry, and veterinary medicine. It has the sole authority in public higher education to award the doctoral degree in all fields of learning, except that it may agree with the California State University to award joint doctoral degrees in selected fields. The University of California shall be the primary state-supported academic agency for research.(d) The independent institutions of higher education shall provide undergraduate and graduate instruction and research in accordance with their respective missions.SECTION 1.Section 89011 of the Education Code is amended to read:89011.(a)It is the intent of the Legislature that public programs of postsecondary education be made available to qualified persons throughout the state, including areas of substantial existing or projected population that are isolated from a campus of the California State University.(b)The Trustees of the California State University shall consider establishing a permanent, state-supported off-campus center on state-owned property in the County of Contra Costa, the purpose of which shall be to continue to offer education programs at the upper division and graduate levels.(c)Pursuant to the establishment of a permanent, state-supported off-campus center as provided by subdivision (b), the trustees shall contract for the preparation of a master plan for physical development, and a detailed survey of the County of Contra Costa, as follows:(1)The master plan for the physical development of the center shall project major land uses, including open space, and the development of physical facilities, including those relating to lecture and laboratory use, and other instructional activities, site work, plant operations, and adjunct operations. The master plan shall be subject to the approval of the Trustees of the California State University.(2)The detailed survey of the County of Contra Costa shall include, but not be limited to, official population projections, an industry and income profile, an analysis of specific education program requirements of potentially qualified students, an assessment of the need for educational services at the upper division and graduate levels, and an assessment of the services currently provided by other public and private institutions of postsecondary education, including the University of California and the California Community Colleges.(d)The trustees shall review the results of the master plan and survey, and shall forward the results to the California Postsecondary Education Commission for its review pursuant to Section 66904.